Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1021XG (4) 91 dg/ns S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Section 1. SUBSTANCE ABUSE APPROPRIATIONS. 1 1. a. There is appropriated from the fund created pursuant 2 to section 8.41 to the department of health and human services 3 for the following federal fiscal years beginning October 1, and 4 ending September 30, the following amounts: 5 FFY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 14,116,120 6 FFY 2026-2027: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 14,116,120 7 b. The appropriations made in this subsection are in the 8 amounts anticipated to be received from the federal government 9 for the designated federal fiscal years under 42 U.S.C. ch. 10 6A, subch. XVII, part B, subpart ii, which provides for the 11 prevention and treatment of substance abuse block grant. 12 The department shall expend the moneys appropriated in this 13 subsection as provided in the federal law making the moneys 14 available and in conformance with chapter 17A . 15 c. Of the moneys appropriated for each federal fiscal year 16 in this subsection, an amount not exceeding 5 percent shall be 17 used by the department for administrative expenses. 18 d. (1) For the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, 19 the department shall expend no less than an amount equal to 20 the amount expended for treatment services in the state fiscal 21 year beginning July 1, 2024, for pregnant women and women with 22 dependent children. 23 (2) For the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, the 24 department shall expend no less than an amount equal to the 25 amount expended for treatment services in the state fiscal 26 year beginning July 1, 2025, for pregnant women and women with 27 dependent children. 28 2. At least 20 percent of the moneys remaining from the 29 appropriation made in subsection 1 for each federal fiscal year 30 shall be allocated for prevention programs. 31 3. In implementing the federal prevention and treatment 32 of substance abuse block grant under 42 U.S.C. ch. 6A, subch. 33 XVII, and any other applicable provisions of the federal Public 34 Health Service Act under 42 U.S.C. ch. 6A, the department shall 35 -1- LSB 1021XG (4) 91 dg/ns 1/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ apply the provisions of Pub. L. No. 106-310, Â§3305, as codified 1 in 42 U.S.C. Â§300x-65, relating to services under such federal 2 law being provided by religious and other nongovernmental 3 organizations. 4 Sec. 2. COMMUNITY MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES APPROPRIATIONS. 5 1. a. There is appropriated from the fund created pursuant 6 to section 8.41 to the department of health and human services 7 for the following federal fiscal years beginning October 1, and 8 ending September 30, the following amounts: 9 FFY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,754,083 10 FFY 2026-2027: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,754,083 11 b. The appropriations made in this subsection are in the 12 amounts anticipated to be received from the federal government 13 for the designated federal fiscal years under 42 U.S.C. ch. 14 6A, subch. XVII, part B, subpart i, which provides for the 15 community mental health services block grant. The department 16 shall expend the moneys appropriated in this subsection as 17 provided in the federal law making the moneys available and in 18 conformance with chapter 17A . 19 c. The department shall allocate not less than 95 percent 20 of the amount of the block grant each federal fiscal year for 21 eligible community mental health services for carrying out 22 the plan submitted to and approved by the federal substance 23 abuse and mental health services administration or required 24 by the federal substance abuse and mental health services 25 administration for the fiscal year involved. 26 2. An amount not exceeding 5 percent of the moneys 27 appropriated in subsection 1 for each federal fiscal year shall 28 be used by the department of health and human services for 29 administrative expenses. From the moneys set aside by this 30 subsection for administrative expenses, the department shall 31 pay to the auditor of state an amount sufficient to pay the 32 cost of auditing the use and administration of the stateâs 33 portion of the moneys appropriated in subsection 1. The 34 auditor of state shall bill the department for the costs of the 35 -2- LSB 1021XG (4) 91 dg/ns 2/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ audits. 1 Sec. 3. MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH SERVICES APPROPRIATIONS. 2 1. a. There is appropriated from the fund created pursuant 3 to section 8.41 to the department of health and human services 4 for the following federal fiscal years beginning October 1, and 5 ending September 30, the following amounts: 6 FFY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,775,530 7 FFY 2026-2027: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,775,530 8 b. The appropriations made in this subsection are in the 9 amounts anticipated to be received from the federal government 10 for the designated federal fiscal years under 42 U.S.C. ch. 11 7, subch. V, which provides for the maternal and child health 12 services block grant. The department shall expend the moneys 13 appropriated in this subsection as provided in the federal law 14 making the moneys available and in conformance with chapter 15 17A . 16 c. Moneys appropriated in this subsection shall not be used 17 by the university of Iowa hospitals and clinics for indirect 18 costs. 19 2. An amount not exceeding 10 percent of the moneys 20 appropriated in subsection 1 for each federal fiscal year shall 21 be used by the department of health and human services for 22 administrative expenses. 23 3. The department of health and human services, department 24 of education, and the university of Iowaâs mobile and regional 25 child health specialty clinics shall continue to pursue to the 26 maximum extent feasible the coordination and integration of 27 services to women and children. 28 4. a. Sixty-three percent of the amount remaining after the 29 allocation made in subsection 2 for each federal fiscal year 30 shall be allocated to supplement appropriations for maternal 31 and child health programs within the department of health and 32 human services. Of these moneys, the following amounts shall 33 be set aside for the statewide perinatal care program for the 34 following federal fiscal years: 35 -3- LSB 1021XG (4) 91 dg/ns 3/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ FFY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,291 1 FFY 2026-2027: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,291 2 b. Thirty-seven percent of the amount remaining after 3 the allocation made in subsection 2 for each federal fiscal 4 year shall be allocated to the university of Iowa hospitals 5 and clinics under the control of the state board of regents 6 for mobile and regional child health specialty clinics. The 7 university of Iowa hospitals and clinics shall not receive an 8 allocation for indirect costs from the moneys for this program. 9 Priority shall be given to establishment and maintenance of a 10 statewide system of mobile and regional child health specialty 11 clinics. 12 5. The department of health and human services shall 13 administer the statewide maternal and child health program 14 and the disabled childrenâs program by conducting mobile and 15 regional child health specialty clinics and conducting other 16 activities to improve the health of low-income women and 17 children and to promote the welfare of children with actual 18 or potential handicapping conditions and chronic illnesses 19 in accordance with the requirements of Tit. V of the federal 20 Social Security Act. 21 Sec. 4. PREVENTIVE HEALTH AND HEALTH SERVICES 22 APPROPRIATIONS. 23 1. a. There is appropriated from the fund created pursuant 24 to section 8.41 to the department of health and human services 25 for the following federal fiscal years beginning October 1, and 26 ending September 30, the following amounts: 27 FFY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,955,591 28 FFY 2026-2027: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,955,591 29 b. The appropriations made in this subsection are in the 30 amounts anticipated to be received from the federal government 31 for the designated federal fiscal years under 42 U.S.C. ch. 6A, 32 subch. XVII, part A, which provides for the preventive health 33 and health services block grant. The department shall expend 34 the moneys appropriated in this subsection as provided in the 35 -4- LSB 1021XG (4) 91 dg/ns 4/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ federal law making the moneys available and in conformance with 1 chapter 17A . 2 2. Of the moneys appropriated in subsection 1 for each 3 federal fiscal year, an amount not exceeding 10 percent shall 4 be used by the department for administrative expenses. 5 3. Of the moneys appropriated in subsection 1 for each 6 federal fiscal year, the specific amount of moneys stipulated 7 by the notice of the block grant award shall be allocated 8 for services to victims of sex offenses and for sex offense 9 prevention. 10 4. After deducting the moneys allocated in subsections 2 and 11 3, the remaining moneys appropriated in subsection 1 for each 12 federal fiscal year may be used by the department for healthy 13 people 2030 and Iowaâs health improvement plan 2023-2027 14 program objectives, preventive health advisory committee, and 15 risk reduction services, including nutrition programs, health 16 incentive programs, chronic disease services, emergency medical 17 services, monitoring of the fluoridation program and start-up 18 fluoridation grants, and acquired immune deficiency syndrome 19 services. The moneys specified in this subsection shall not be 20 used by the university of Iowa hospitals and clinics or by the 21 state hygienic laboratory for the funding of indirect costs. 22 Sec. 5. RESIDENTIAL SUBSTANCE ABUSE TREATMENT FOR STATE 23 PRISONERS FORMULA GRANT PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS. There is 24 appropriated from the fund created pursuant to section 8.41 to 25 the office of drug control policy of the department of public 26 safety for the following federal fiscal years beginning October 27 1, and ending September 30, the following amounts: 28 FFY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 422,329 29 FFY 2026-2027: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 307,388 30 The appropriations made in this section are the amounts 31 anticipated to be received from the federal government for the 32 designated federal fiscal years under 42 U.S.C. ch. 46, subch. 33 XII-G, which provides grants for substance abuse treatment 34 programs in state and local correctional facilities. The 35 -5- LSB 1021XG (4) 91 dg/ns 5/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ drug policy director shall expend the moneys appropriated in 1 this section as provided in the federal law making the moneys 2 available and in conformance with chapter 17A . 3 Sec. 6. EDWARD BYRNE MEMORIAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE GRANT 4 PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated from the fund 5 created pursuant to section 8.41 to the office of drug control 6 policy of the department of public safety for the following 7 federal fiscal years beginning October 1, and ending September 8 30, the following amounts: 9 FFY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,964,093 10 FFY 2026-2027: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,178,973 11 The appropriations made in this section are in the amounts 12 anticipated to be received from the federal government for the 13 designated fiscal years under 42 U.S.C. ch. 46, subch. V, which 14 provides for the Edward Byrne memorial justice assistance grant 15 program. The drug policy director shall expend the moneys 16 appropriated in this section as provided in the federal law 17 making the moneys available and in conformance with chapter 18 17A . 19 Sec. 7. COMMUNITY SERVICES APPROPRIATIONS. 20 1. a. There is appropriated from the fund created pursuant 21 to section 8.41 to the department of health and human services 22 for the following federal fiscal years beginning October 1, and 23 ending September 30, the following amounts: 24 FFY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,300,123 25 FFY 2026-2027: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,300,123 26 b. The appropriations made in this subsection are in the 27 amounts anticipated to be received from the federal government 28 for the designated federal fiscal years under 42 U.S.C. ch. 29 106, which provides for the community services block grant. 30 The department of health and human services shall expend the 31 moneys appropriated in this subsection as provided in the 32 federal law making the moneys available and in conformance with 33 chapter 17A . 34 c. Each federal fiscal year, the department of health and 35 -6- LSB 1021XG (4) 91 dg/ns 6/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ human services shall allocate not less than 96 percent of 1 the amount of the block grants to eligible community action 2 agencies for programs benefiting low-income persons. Each 3 eligible agency shall receive a minimum allocation of not less 4 than $185,000. The minimum allocation shall be achieved by 5 redistributing increased moneys from agencies experiencing 6 a greater share of available moneys. The moneys shall be 7 distributed on the basis of the poverty-level population in the 8 area represented by the community action areas compared to the 9 size of the poverty-level population in the state. 10 2. An amount not exceeding 4 percent of the moneys 11 appropriated in subsection 1 for each federal fiscal year 12 shall be used by the department of health and human services 13 for administrative expenses. From the moneys set aside by 14 this subsection for administrative expenses, the department 15 of health and human services shall pay to the auditor of 16 state an amount sufficient to pay the cost of auditing the 17 use and administration of the stateâs portion of the moneys 18 appropriated in subsection 1. The auditor of state shall bill 19 the department of health and human services for the costs of 20 the audits. 21 Sec. 8. COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT APPROPRIATIONS. 22 1. a. There is appropriated from the fund created pursuant 23 to section 8.41 to the economic development authority for the 24 following federal fiscal years beginning October 1, and ending 25 September 30, the following amounts: 26 FFY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 26,500,000 27 FFY 2026-2027: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 26,500,000 28 b. The appropriations made in this subsection are in the 29 amounts anticipated to be received from the federal government 30 for the designated federal fiscal years under 42 U.S.C. ch. 31 69, which provides for community development block grants. 32 The economic development authority shall expend the moneys 33 appropriated in this subsection as provided in the federal law 34 making the moneys available and in conformance with chapter 35 -7- LSB 1021XG (4) 91 dg/ns 7/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 17A . 1 2. a. An amount not exceeding $1,160,000 for the federal 2 fiscal year beginning October 1, 2025, shall be used by the 3 economic development authority for administrative expenses for 4 the community development block grant. The total amount used 5 for administrative expenses includes $630,000 for the federal 6 fiscal year beginning October 1, 2025, of moneys appropriated 7 in subsection 1 and a matching contribution from the state 8 equal to $530,000 from the appropriation of state moneys for 9 the community development block grant and state appropriations 10 for related activities of the economic development authority. 11 From the moneys set aside for administrative expenses by this 12 subsection, the economic development authority shall pay to 13 the auditor of state an amount sufficient to pay the cost of 14 auditing the use and administration of the stateâs portion of 15 the moneys appropriated in subsection 1. The auditor of state 16 shall bill the authority for the costs of the audit. 17 b. An amount not exceeding $1,160,000 for the federal 18 fiscal year beginning October 1, 2026, shall be used by the 19 economic development authority for administrative expenses for 20 the community development block grant. The total amount used 21 for administrative expenses includes $630,000 for the federal 22 fiscal year beginning October 1, 2026, of moneys appropriated 23 in subsection 1 and a matching contribution from the state 24 equal to $530,000 from the appropriation of state moneys for 25 the community development block grant and state appropriations 26 for related activities of the economic development authority. 27 From the moneys set aside for administrative expenses by this 28 subsection, the economic development authority shall pay to 29 the auditor of state an amount sufficient to pay the cost of 30 auditing the use and administration of the stateâs portion of 31 the moneys appropriated in subsection 1. The auditor of state 32 shall bill the authority for the costs of the audit. 33 Sec. 9. SURFACE TRANSPORTATION BLOCK GRANT PROGRAM 34 APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated from the fund created 35 -8- LSB 1021XG (4) 91 dg/ns 8/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ pursuant to section 8.41 to the department of transportation 1 for the following federal fiscal years beginning October 1, and 2 ending September 30, the following amounts: 3 FFY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,600,000 4 FFY 2026-2027: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,600,000 5 The appropriations made in this section are the amounts 6 anticipated to be received from the federal government for 7 the designated fiscal years under 23 U.S.C. ch. 1, Â§133, 8 which provides funding allocated by the state transportation 9 commission for state and local transportation projects. The 10 department shall expend the moneys appropriated in this section 11 as provided in the federal law making the moneys available and 12 in conformance with chapter 17A . 13 Sec. 10. LOW-INCOME HOME ENERGY ASSISTANCE APPROPRIATIONS. 14 1. a. There is appropriated from the fund created pursuant 15 to section 8.41 to the department of health and human services 16 for the following federal fiscal years beginning October 1, and 17 ending September 30, the following amounts: 18 FFY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 58,058,248 19 FFY 2026-2027: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 58,058,248 20 b. The appropriations made in this subsection are in the 21 amounts anticipated to be received from the federal government 22 for the designated federal fiscal years under 42 U.S.C. 23 ch. 94, subch. II, which provides for the low-income home 24 energy assistance block grants. The department of health and 25 human services shall expend the moneys appropriated in this 26 subsection as provided in the federal law making the moneys 27 available and in conformance with chapter 17A . 28 2. Up to 15 percent, or up to 25 percent if a waiver is 29 approved by the United States department of health and human 30 services, of the amount appropriated in this section that is 31 actually received for each federal fiscal year shall be used 32 for residential weatherization or other related home repairs 33 for low-income households. Of this allocation amount, not more 34 than 10 percent may be used for administrative expenses. 35 -9- LSB 1021XG (4) 91 dg/ns 9/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 3. After subtracting the allocation in subsection 2, no 1 less than 8.4 percent of the remaining moneys for each federal 2 fiscal year are allocated for administrative expenses of the 3 low-income home energy assistance program contractors, and 4 up to 1.6 percent of the remaining moneys are allocated each 5 federal fiscal year for the low-income home energy assistance 6 program for administrative expenses of the department of 7 health and human services. The costs of auditing the use and 8 administration of the portion of the appropriation in this 9 section that is retained by the state shall be paid from the 10 amount allocated in this subsection each federal fiscal year to 11 the department of health and human services. The auditor of 12 state shall bill the department of health and human services 13 for the audit costs. 14 4. The remaining moneys of the appropriation made in this 15 section for each federal fiscal year following the allocations 16 made in subsections 2 and 3, shall be used to help eligible 17 households as defined in 42 U.S.C. ch. 94, subch. II, to meet 18 home energy costs. 19 5. Not more than 10 percent of the amount appropriated in 20 this section each federal fiscal year that is actually received 21 may be carried forward for use in the succeeding federal fiscal 22 year. 23 6. Expenditures for assessment and resolution of energy 24 problems shall be limited to not more than 5 percent of the 25 amount appropriated in this section for each federal fiscal 26 year that is actually received. 27 Sec. 11. SOCIAL SERVICES APPROPRIATIONS. 28 1. There is appropriated from the fund created pursuant to 29 section 8.41 to the department of health and human services for 30 the following federal fiscal years beginning October 1, and 31 ending September 30, the following amounts: 32 FFY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 15,264,832 33 FFY 2026-2027: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 15,264,832 34 2. The appropriations made in this section are in the 35 -10- LSB 1021XG (4) 91 dg/ns 10/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ amounts anticipated to be received from the federal government 1 for the designated federal fiscal years under 42 U.S.C. ch. 7, 2 subch. XX, which provides for the social services block grant. 3 The department of health and human services shall expend the 4 moneys appropriated in this section as provided in the federal 5 law making the moneys available and in conformance with chapter 6 17A . 7 Sec. 12. SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT PLAN. 8 1. The department of health and human services during each 9 state fiscal year shall develop a plan for the use of federal 10 social services block grant moneys for the subsequent state 11 fiscal year. 12 2. The proposed plan shall include all programs and services 13 at the state level which the department proposes to fund with 14 federal social services block grant moneys, and shall identify 15 state and other moneys which the department proposes to use to 16 fund the state programs and services. 17 3. The proposed plan shall also include all local programs 18 and services which are eligible to be funded with federal 19 social services block grant moneys, the total amount of federal 20 social services block grant moneys available for the local 21 programs and services, and the manner of distribution of the 22 federal social services block grant moneys to the counties. 23 The proposed plan shall identify state and local moneys which 24 will be used to fund the local programs and services. 25 4. The proposed plan shall be submitted with the 26 departmentâs budget requests to the governor and the general 27 assembly. 28 Sec. 13. PROJECTS FOR ASSISTANCE IN TRANSITION FROM 29 HOMELESSNESS. 30 1. Upon receipt of the minimum formula grant from the 31 substance abuse and mental health services administration to 32 provide mental health services for the homeless, for the state 33 fiscal years beginning July 1, 2025, and July 1, 2026, the 34 department of health and human services shall assure that a 35 -11- LSB 1021XG (4) 91 dg/ns 11/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ project which receives moneys under the formula grant shall do 1 all of the following: 2 a. Provide outreach and engagement to homeless individuals 3 and individuals at risk of homelessness and assesses those 4 individuals for serious mental illness. 5 b. Enroll those individuals with serious mental illness who 6 are willing to accept services through the project. 7 c. Provide case management to homeless persons. 8 d. Provide appropriate training to persons who provide 9 services to persons targeted by the grant. 10 e. Assure a local match share of 25 percent. 11 f. Refer homeless individuals and individuals at risk of 12 homelessness to primary health care, job training, educational 13 services, and relevant housing services. 14 2. A project may expend moneys for community mental health 15 services, diagnostic services, crisis intervention services, 16 habilitation and rehabilitation services, substance-related 17 disorder services, supportive and supervisory services to 18 homeless persons living in residential settings that are 19 not otherwise supported, and housing services including 20 minor renovation, expansion, and repair of housing, security 21 deposits, planning of housing, technical assistance in 22 applying for housing, improving the coordination of housing 23 services, the costs associated with matching eligible homeless 24 individuals with appropriate housing, and one-time rental 25 payments to prevent eviction. 26 Sec. 14. CHILD CARE AND DEVELOPMENT APPROPRIATIONS. 27 1. a. There is appropriated from the fund created pursuant 28 to section 8.41 to the department of health and human services 29 for the following federal fiscal years beginning October 1, and 30 ending September 30, the following amounts: 31 FFY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $109,630,285 32 FFY 2026-2027: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $109,630,285 33 b. The appropriations made in this section are in the 34 amounts anticipated to be received from the federal government 35 -12- LSB 1021XG (4) 91 dg/ns 12/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ for the designated federal fiscal years under 42 U.S.C. 1 ch. 105, subch. II-B, which provides for the child care and 2 development block grant. The department shall expend the 3 moneys appropriated in this section as provided in the federal 4 law making the moneys available and in conformance with chapter 5 17A . 6 2. Moneys appropriated in this section that remain 7 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year 8 shall revert to be available for appropriation for purposes of 9 the child care and development block grant in the succeeding 10 fiscal year. 11 Sec. 15. TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR NEEDY FAMILIES 12 APPROPRIATIONS. 13 1. a. There is appropriated from the fund created in 14 section 8.41 to the department of health and human services for 15 the following federal fiscal years beginning October 1, and 16 ending September 30, the following amounts: 17 FFY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,980,383 18 FFY 2026-2027: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,980,383 19 b. The appropriations made in this subsection are in the 20 amounts anticipated to be received from the federal government 21 for the designated federal fiscal years under the federal 22 Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation 23 Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-193, and successor legislation, 24 which provides for the temporary assistance for needy families 25 block grant. The department of health and human services 26 shall expend the moneys appropriated in this subsection in 27 conformance with chapter 17A, and as provided in the federal 28 law making the moneys available, to meet one of the four 29 core purposes of the temporary assistance for needy families 30 block grant as described in 45 C.F.R. Â§260.20, including by 31 modernizing applicable programs to promote economic mobility 32 and self-sufficiency, ensuring families are able to overcome 33 benefit cliffs, encouraging healthy families, and streamlining 34 service delivery to reduce duplication of services. 35 -13- LSB 1021XG (4) 91 dg/ns 13/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 2. Up to 15 percent of the moneys appropriated in subsection 1 1 for each federal fiscal year shall be used by the department 2 of health and human services for administrative expenses in 3 accordance with the federal Personal Responsibility and Work 4 Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-193, 5 and successor legislation. The costs of auditing the use and 6 administration of the portion of the appropriation in this 7 section that is retained by the state shall be paid from the 8 amount allocated in this subsection each federal fiscal year to 9 the department of health and human services. The auditor of 10 state shall bill the department of health and human services 11 for the audit costs. 12 3. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 13 this section for the federal fiscal year beginning October 1, 14 2025, and ending September 30, 2026, that remain unencumbered 15 or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 16 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 17 designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 18 Sec. 16. PROCEDURE FOR REDUCED FEDERAL MONEYS. 19 1. Unless otherwise necessary to meet federal requirements, 20 if the moneys received from the federal government for 21 the block grants specified in this Act are less than the 22 amounts appropriated, the moneys actually received shall be 23 prorated by the governor for the various programs, other 24 than for the services to victims of sex offenses and for sex 25 offense prevention under section 4, subsection 3, of this 26 Act, for which each block grant is available according to 27 the percentages that each program is to receive as specified 28 in this Act. However, if the governor determines that the 29 moneys allocated by the percentages will not be sufficient to 30 accomplish the purposes of a particular program, or if the 31 appropriation is not allocated by percentage, the governor may 32 allocate the moneys in a manner which will accomplish to the 33 greatest extent possible the purposes of the various programs 34 for which the block grants are available. 35 -14- LSB 1021XG (4) 91 dg/ns 14/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 2. Before the governor implements the actions provided for 1 in subsection 1, the following procedures shall be taken: 2 a. The chairpersons and ranking members of the senate and 3 house standing committees on appropriations, the appropriate 4 chairpersons and ranking members of subcommittees of those 5 committees, and the director of the legislative services agency 6 shall be notified of the proposed action. 7 b. The notice shall include the proposed allocations, 8 and information on the reasons why particular percentages or 9 amounts of moneys are allocated to the individual programs, 10 the departments and programs affected, and other information 11 deemed useful. Chairpersons and ranking members notified shall 12 be allowed at least two weeks to review and comment on the 13 proposed action before the action is taken. 14 Sec. 17. PROCEDURE FOR INCREASED FEDERAL MONEYS. 15 1. Unless otherwise necessary to meet federal requirements, 16 if moneys received from the federal government in the form of 17 block grants exceed the amounts appropriated in sections 1, 2, 18 3, 4, and 8 of this Act, the excess shall be prorated to the 19 appropriate programs according to the percentages specified in 20 those sections, except additional moneys shall not be prorated 21 for administrative expenses. 22 2. If actual moneys received from the federal government 23 from block grants exceed the amount appropriated in section 10 24 of this Act for the low-income home energy assistance program, 25 not more than 15 percent of the excess may be allocated to the 26 low-income residential weatherization program and not more than 27 10 percent of the excess may be used for administrative costs. 28 3. If moneys received from the federal government from 29 community services block grants exceed the amount appropriated 30 in section 7 of this Act, 100 percent of the excess is 31 allocated to the community services block grant program. 32 Sec. 18. PROCEDURE FOR EXPENDITURE OF ADDITIONAL FEDERAL 33 MONEYS. If other federal grants, receipts, and moneys and 34 other nonstate grants, receipts, and moneys become available 35 -15- LSB 1021XG (4) 91 dg/ns 15/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ or are awarded which are not available or awarded during the 1 period in which the general assembly is in session, but which 2 require expenditure by the applicable department or agency 3 prior to March 15 of the fiscal years beginning July 1, 2025, 4 and July 1, 2026, these grants, receipts, and moneys are 5 appropriated to the extent necessary, provided that the fiscal 6 committee of the legislative council is notified within 30 days 7 of receipt of the grants, receipts, or moneys and the fiscal 8 committee of the legislative council has an opportunity to 9 comment on the expenditure of the grants, receipts, or moneys. 10 Sec. 19. OTHER GRANTS, RECEIPTS, AND MONEYS. Federal 11 grants, receipts, and moneys and other nonstate grants, 12 receipts, and moneys, available in whole or in part of the 13 state fiscal years beginning July 1, 2025, and July 1, 2026, 14 are appropriated to the following departments and agencies that 15 are designated by and for the purposes set forth in the grants, 16 receipts, or conditions accompanying the receipt of the moneys, 17 unless otherwise provided by law: 18 1. Department of administrative services. 19 2. Department of agriculture and land stewardship. 20 3. Office of auditor of state. 21 4. Department for the blind. 22 5. Department of corrections. 23 6. Economic development authority. 24 7. Department of education. 25 8. Iowa ethics and campaign disclosure board. 26 9. Iowa finance authority. 27 10. Offices of the governor and lieutenant governor. 28 11. Department of health and human services. 29 12. Department of homeland security and emergency 30 management. 31 13. Department of inspections, appeals, and licensing. 32 14. Department of insurance and financial services. 33 15. Judicial branch. 34 16. Department of justice. 35 -16- LSB 1021XG (4) 91 dg/ns 16/ 17 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 17. Iowa law enforcement academy. 1 18. Department of management. 2 19. Department of natural resources. 3 20. Board of parole. 4 21. Department of public defense. 5 22. Department of public safety. 6 23. State board of regents. 7 24. Department of revenue. 8 25. Office of secretary of state. 9 26. Iowa state fair authority. 10 27. Office for state-federal relations. 11 28. Iowa telecommunications and technology commission. 12 29. Office of treasurer of state. 13 30. Department of transportation. 14 31. Iowa utilities commission. 15 32. Department of veterans affairs. 16 33. Department of workforce development. 17